Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-1115
Allowable costs, defined.

Allowable costs means salaries, wages, benefits, any medical expenditure by a school district for purposes of providing individualized education plan services for a special education student and health protection to the provider of the services, and maintenance, supplies, travel, and other expenses essential to carry out the provisions for special education and support services.

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3305;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 797;

Laws 1997, LB 865, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 1243, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 14.